Utah statutes.
9-9-209.   Tribal ordinance or custom given full force and effect.

Any tribal ordinance or custom adopted by an Indian tribe, band, or community in the exercise of any authority that it may possess shall, if not inconsistent with any applicable civil law of the state, be given full force and effect in the determination of civil causes of action.

